Utah statutes.
67-24-103.   Qualified prohibitions on lobbyists -- Time limit -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a former state official serving on or after May 12, 2009, may not become a lobbyist or engage in lobbying that would require registration as a lobbyist under Title 36, Chapter 11, Lobbyist Disclosure and Regulation Act, for one calendar year, beginning on the day the state official leaves office and ending on the one-year anniversary of that day.

(2)  This section does not apply if the former state official engages in lobbying on behalf of:

(a)  himself; or

(b)  a business with which he is associated, unless the primary activity of the business is lobbying or governmental relations.

